Louisiana, session 2026, SB365.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 15 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 18:1961 through 1966, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 15. Louisiana Voting Rights Act
§1961. Findings
A. The Legislature of Louisiana finds that the right to vote is essential to
the effective operation of a democratic government. The legislature further
finds that the opportunity of voters to elect candidates to represent the needs
and values of their community is the foundation of a representative democracy.
The legislature acknowledges that past and present forms of discrimination
Page 1 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
limiting equal access to registration, voting, and other forms of civic
participation can have the effect of minimizing the electoral strength of
protected class members and preventing the election of their candidates of
choice. To preserve the integrity of our democracy and principle of fair
representation, the state has a compelling interest in taking every necessary step
to protect the freedom to vote against efforts to deny or abridge this
fundamental right on account of race, color, or membership in a language-
minority group. The legislature, therefore, enacts Chapter 15 "The Louisiana
Voting Rights Act" to prohibit any political subdivision or state agency from
engaging in voter suppression and vote dilution and to establish the Louisiana
Voting Rights Commission to enforce this Chapter.
§1962. Definitions
A. "Election policy or practice" means any qualification to be a voter,
prerequisite to voting, method of election, or any other law, statute, ordinance,
resolution, charter or code provision, regulation, rule, policy, practice,
procedure, standard, or any other action with respect to voting, electoral, or
jurisdictional boundaries, or the administration or schedule of elections.
B. "Governing body" means the entity with official authority to make
and enforce decisions, policies, and laws for a political subdivision.
C. "Method of election" means the manner or mechanism by which
candidates are elected to a governmental body of a political subdivision, and
includes any at-large, district-based, proportional, semi-proportional, or other
method of election, as well as any districting or redistricting plan used to elect
candidates to the governmental body.
D. "Political subdivision" means any parish, municipality, jurisdiction,
school district, election commission, circuit clerk, or any other governmental
entity in which elections are conducted or that administers elections, or any
staff or agents of the entity.
E. "Protected class" means any group of individuals who are members
Page 2 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
of any race, color, or language minority, including but not limited to a class of
two or more such groups, and includes individuals who are members of a
minimum-reporting category that have been officially recognized by the United
States Census Bureau.
F. "Racially polarized voting" means voting in which there is a
divergence in the candidate preferences, political preferences, or electoral
choices of members in a protected class, including the combined preferences of
a class comprised of two or more groups of voters, from the candidate
preferences, political preferences, or electoral choices of members of another
class or set of classes.
G. "Vote" or "voting" means all action necessary to make a vote
effective in any primary, special, or general election, including but not limited
to registration or other action required by law prerequisite to voting, casting a
ballot by any method permitted by law, including any method available as a
remedy under this Chapter, and having such ballot counted properly and
included in the appropriate totals of votes received.
§1963. Prohibition on voter suppression and vote dilution
A. Prohibition on voter suppression. No political subdivision or state
agency may implement, impose, or enforce any election policy or practice that
results in, is likely to result in, or is motivated by, in whole or in part, the intent
to result in voter suppression.
(1) A violation of R.S. 18:1963(A) is established if one of the following is
present:
(a) A material disparity affecting protected class members in voter
participation, access to voting opportunities, or the opportunity or ability to
participate in any stage of the political process, as a result of the policy or
practice; or
(b) Based on the totality of circumstances, an impairment of the equal
opportunity or ability of protected class members to participate in any stage of
Page 3 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
the political process.
(2) It shall not be a violation of R.S. 18:1963(A)(1) if the political
subdivision or state agency demonstrates, by clear and convincing evidence, that
the following exists:
(a) The election policy or practice is necessary to significantly further a
compelling and particularized governmental interest; and
(b) There is no reasonable alternative election policy or practice that
comparably furthers the compelling and particularized governmental interest
and results in a smaller disparity between protected class members and other
members of the electorate.
(3) A violation of R.S. 18:1963(A) may also be established through direct
or circumstantial evidence of intentional discrimination; however, evidence of
intentional discrimination, including evidence concerning the intent of electors,
elected officials, or public officials to discriminate against protected class
members, is not required under R.S. 18:1963(A)(1).
B. Prohibition on vote dilution. No political subdivision may employ any
method of election that has the effect, will likely have the effect, or is motivated
in part, by the intent of diluting the vote of protected class members.
(1) A violation of R.S. 18:1963(B) is established if (i) elections in the
political subdivision exhibit racially-polarized voting resulting in an impairment
of the equal opportunity or ability of protected class members to nominate or
elect candidates of their choice or (ii) based on the totality of circumstances, the
equal opportunity or ability of protected class members to nominate or elect
candidates of their choice, is impaired; and there must be either racially-
polarized voting or impairment of equal opportunity plus evidence that another
method of election or change to the existing method would likely mitigate the
impairment. Another method of election or change to the existing method of
election exists that could be constitutionally adopted or ordered under R.S.
18:1965(F) would likely mitigate the impairment; and there must be either
Page 4 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
racially polarized voting or impairment of equal opportunity PLUS evidence
that another method of election or change to the existing method would likely
mitigate the impairment
(2) A violation may be established through direct or circumstantial
evidence of intentional discrimination; however, evidence of intentional
discrimination, including evidence concerning the intent of electors, elected
officials, or public officials to discriminate against protected class members, is
not required under R.S. 18:1963(B)(1).
C. Guidelines and rules for evaluating voter suppression and vote
dilution, R.S. 18:1963(A) and (B), are evaluated subject to the guidelines and
rules enumerated below:
(1) The following factors may be relevant to evaluate the totality of
circumstances under R.S. 18:1963(A)(1)(b), or R.S. 18:1963(B)(1)(a)(ii):
(a) The history of discrimination with respect to the protected class at
issue.
(b) The extent to which members of the relevant protected class are
disadvantaged or otherwise bear the effects of public or private discrimination
in areas such as education, employment, health, criminal justice, housing,
transportation, land use, or environmental protection.
(c) The use of any election policy or practice that may enhance the
discriminatory or dilutive effects of the relevant election policy, or practice, or
method of election in the political subdivision.
(d) The extent to which members of the relevant protected class vote or
register to vote at lower rates.
(e) The extent to which members of the relevant protected class have
historically made campaign contributions at lower rates.
(f) The extent to which candidates who are members of the relevant
protected class members have faced hostility or barriers with respect to
campaigning, getting on the ballot, receiving financial support, or receiving any
Page 5 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
other support for an election.
(g) The use of overt or subtle racial appeals, whether in the course of
political campaigns or by government officials, including racial appeals made
in public discourse or in connection with the adoption or maintenance of the
election policy or practice.
(h) The extent to which the members of the relevant protected class have
been elected to office.
(i) The lack of responsiveness by elected officials to the particular needs
of members of the relevant protected class or a community of members of the
relevant protected class.
(j) Whether the election policy or practice is necessary to significantly
further a compelling and particularized governmental interest.
(k) The process that led to the adoption of the election policy or practice.
(l) Other factors deemed relevant.
(2) No set number or combination of factors listed in Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection must be met to determine that a violation occurred.
(3) There is no requirement that evidence must affect all individuals or
groups within a protected class to be relevant.
(4) For alleged violations pertaining to a particular political subdivision,
evidence of the factors listed in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection may be deemed
more probative if it relates to the political subdivision in which the alleged
violation occurred, but evidence related to the state or the geographic region in
which that political subdivision is located may also be probative. The fact that
similar or worse circumstances may exist in other political subdivisions does not
reduce the probative value of the evidence relevant to the particular political
subdivision.
(5) To determine whether elections in the political subdivision exhibit
racially-polarized voting under R.S. 18:1963(B)(1)(a)(i) the following shall be
applied:
Page 6 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
(a) Racially-polarized voting is assessed based on the relevant election
results, which may include but are not limited to elections for offices of the
political subdivision; elections held in the political subdivision for other offices,
such as state or federal offices; and other electoral choices that bear on the
rights and privileges of the protected class.
(b) No set number or combination of elections is required to establish the
existence of racially-polarized voting.
(i) Evidence of nonpolarized voting in elections for offices outside the
political subdivision does not preclude a finding of racially-polarized voting
based on elections for offices of the political subdivision.
(ii) Nonstatistical or nonquantitative evidence does not preclude a
finding of racially-polarized voting based on statistical or quantitative evidence.
(iii) Low or high turnout or registration rates among protected class
members does not preclude a finding of racially-polarized voting.
(c) When assessing the combined candidate preferences, political
preferences, or electoral choices of a protected class comprised of two or more
groups of voters, there is no requirement that it be statistically shown that each
group or subgroup be separately polarized from those of other voters.
(d) The causes of racially-polarized voting are not relevant, and the
existence of alternative explanations, including partisan explanations, does not
preclude a finding of racially polarized voting.
(6) When evaluating whether a violation of this Section is present, the
following circumstances are never relevant:
(a) The absolute number or share of protected class members on whom
the election policy or practice imposes a material burden is small.
(b) The degree to which the election policy or practice has a long
pedigree or was in widespread use at some earlier date.
(c) The use of an identical or similar election policy or practice in other
states or political subdivisions.
Page 7 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
(d) The availability of forms of voting unimpacted by the election policy
or practice.
(7) A governmental interest in preventing voter fraud or bolstering voter
confidence in the integrity of elections is irrelevant unless there is substantial
evidence that criminal activity by individual electors has occurred in the
political subdivision in substantial numbers and the connection between the
election policy or practice and a state interest in preventing that type of
criminal activity or bolstering voter confidence in the integrity of elections is
supported by substantial evidence.
(8) Whether protected class members typically elect candidates of their
choice to the governing body in approximate proportion to their total number
or share of the population, may be relevant under R.S. 18:1963(B).
(9) For the purpose of satisfying R.S. 18:1963(B), particularly R.S.
18:1963(B)(1)(b), it is not necessary for the total number or share of protected
class members to exceed any numerical threshold in any district or in the
political subdivision as a whole.
(10) Upon finding a violation of this Section, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, a court must exercise its equitable powers to fashion relief so
it completely remedies the dilution or suppression, which may include but is not
limited to altering the method of election used by the political subdivision.
§1964. Louisiana Voting Rights Commission
A. The Louisiana Voting Rights Commission (commission) is hereby
established in the office of the Louisiana inspector general. The commission may
promulgate rules under the Louisiana Administrative Procedure Act.
B. Commissioners. The commission shall consist of five commissioners,
each of whom shall serve staggered five-year terms. Commissioners shall be
compensated for their time spent on commission business at an hourly rate
based on the rate equivalent to an assistant attorney general.
C. Nominating committee. (1) A nominating committee shall be formed
Page 8 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
to identify qualified candidates to serve as members of the commission. The
nominating committee shall be comprised of nominating organizations.
Organizations may apply with the inspector general to be certified as a
nominating organization for five-year terms, at which point the organizations
may be recertified. The inspector general must certify any organization that
applies to be a nominating organization if the organization complies with the
following:
(a) Demonstrates commitment to the purpose of the commission by
securing the voting rights of members of a protected class as defined by the
commission, including but not limited to reference to members of a protected
class in its mission statement, involvement in numerous voting rights cases
brought within the state on behalf of members of protected classes, or
involvement in advocacy in support of members of protected classes or the
commission.
(b) Has registered as a nonprofit corporation with the secretary of state.
(c) Demonstrates continuous operation as a nonprofit organization under
26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or as a nonprofit corporation registered with the secretary
of state for at least five years.
(2) If the inspector general fails to timely certify an organization that
satisfies these qualifications following the organization's application to be
certified as a nominating organization, the organization may file an action
against the inspector general for a declaratory judgment certifying the
organization as a nominating organization.
(3) A nominating organization may be removed for cause by a majority
vote of all of the nominating commissioners.
(4) If there are fewer than sixteen nominating organizations certified by
the inspector general, the nominating committee shall consist of all of the
nominating organizations. If there are sixteen or more nominating
organizations certified by the Inspector General, the nominating committee
Page 9 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
shall consist of fifteen nominating organizations to be randomly selected from
all nominating organizations on an annual basis.
(5) The nominating committee shall select its own chair to preside over
meetings and voting.
D. Selection of commissioners. Commissioners shall be selected as
follows:
(1) The nominating committee shall solicit applications to serve as a
commissioner from across the state. A commissioner shall satisfy all of the
following criteria:
(a) Be a Louisiana resident.
(b) Be a member of the Louisiana State Bar with at least five years of
legal experience.
(c) Has demonstrated experience representing or advocating on behalf
of members of protected classes.
(d) Has not served in elected office within the previous five years.
(e) Is not currently serving in any government office or holding any
political party office.
(2) The nominating committee shall maintain a qualified candidate pool
consisting of thirty qualified candidates to serve on the commission. Individuals
shall only be added to the qualified candidate pool upon a three-fifths vote of
the nominating committee. The size of the qualified candidate pool may be
increased or decreased from thirty qualified individuals by a three-fifths vote
of the nominating committee.
(3) All commissioners shall be randomly selected from the qualified
candidate pool. Upon the initial formation of the commission, five
commissioners shall be randomly selected from the qualified candidate pool and
randomly assigned to term lengths of five years, four years, three years, two
years, and one year. At least sixty days before the conclusion of each
commissioner's term, a new commissioner shall be randomly selected from the
Page 10 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
qualified candidate pool to serve a five-year term upon the conclusion of the
current commissioner's term. Within thirty days after a vacancy occurs on the
commission, a new commissioner shall be randomly selected from the qualified
candidate pool to complete the vacant term.
E. Staff and expenditures. The commission may hire staff and make
expenditures as necessary to carry out its responsibilities.
§1965. Preclearance
A. Preclearance. The implementation of a covered policy, as defined in
Subsection C of this Section, by a covered political subdivision, as defined in
Subsection D of this Section, shall be subject to preclearance by the commission
pursuant to this Section.
B. The commission is responsible for administering the provisions of this
Section.
(1) The commission shall determine, on a fixed date, on an annual basis,
which political subdivisions are covered and publish a list of covered political
subdivisions on its website no later than thirty days after making such
determinations.
(2) All coverage determinations shall be made by the commission based
on data provided by reputable sources, including but not limited to the U.S.
Census Bureau data from the American Community Survey and other federal
or state offices. If necessary data is not available, the commission shall base
coverage determinations on estimates derived from available data using
validated methodologies.
(3) The commission shall give notice directly to each covered political
subdivision and provide to them the corresponding requirements accompanying
such coverage.
(4) The commission may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this Section.
C. Covered policies. A covered policy includes the following items:
Page 11 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
(1) Any new or modified election policy or practice.
(2) Any change in the powers, duties, responsibilities, jurisdiction, or
authority of an elected official, or any action or policy that has the purpose or
effect of diminishing, reassigning, or altering the functional role or influence of
an elected official.
(3) Any new or modified method of election or maintenance of a method
of election following a decennial census.
D. Covered political subdivisions. A covered political subdivision shall
include:
(1) Any political subdivision that, at any point in the previous twenty-five
years, has been subject to a court order based upon a judicial finding of a
qualifying violation or its factual predicate; or subject to a consent decree or
court-approved settlement agreement in which a qualifying violation was
conceded or stipulated by the political subdivision. A qualifying violation
includes a violation of this Chapter, the federal Voting Rights Act, the 15th or
24th Amendments to the United States Constitution, a voting-related violation
of the 14th Amendment to the United States Constitution, or any violation of
any other state or federal election law, concerning discrimination against
protected class members a violation of any state or federal civil rights law or the
14th Amendment to the United States Constitution concerning a pattern, policy,
or practice of discrimination against protected class members.
(2) Any political subdivision that, at any point in the last twenty-five
years, enacted or implemented a covered policy without obtaining preclearance
for that policy pursuant to this Section.
(3) Any political subdivision that contains at least one thousand eligible
voters of any protected class, or in which members of any protected class
constitute at least ten percent of the eligible voter population of such political
subdivision, and in which, at any point in the last ten years, the percentage of
voters of any protected class in a political subdivision which participated in any
Page 12 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
general election for any political subdivision office was at least ten percentage
points lower than the percentage of all voters in the political subdivision that
participated in such election.
(4) Any political subdivision that contains at least one thousand eligible
voters of any protected class, or in which members of any protected class
constitute at least ten percent of the eligible voter population of the political
subdivision, and in which, at any point in the last ten years, the percentage of
eligible voters of that protected class who were registered to vote was at least ten
percentage points lower than the percentage of all eligible voters in the political
subdivision who were registered to vote.
(5) Any political subdivision that contains at least one thousand eligible
voters of any protected class, or in which members of any protected class
constitute at least ten percent of the eligible voter population of the political
subdivision, and in which, at any point in the last ten years, the poverty rate
among the population of a protected class exceeded the poverty rate among the
population of the political subdivision, as a whole, by at least ten percentage
points.
(6) Any political subdivision that contains at least one thousand eligible
voters of any protected class, or in which members of any protected class
constitute at least ten percent of the eligible voter population of the political
subdivision, and in which, at any point in the last ten years, the arrest rate
among members of such protected class exceeded the arrest rate among the
population of the political subdivision, as a whole, by at least ten percentage
points.
(7) Any political subdivision that contains at least one thousand eligible
voters of any protected class, or in which members of any protected class
constitute at least ten percent of the eligible voter population of the school
district, and in which, at any point in the last ten years, the percentage of
eligible voters of that protected class who have a high school diploma was at
Page 13 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
least ten percentage points lower than the percentage of all eligible voters in the
political subdivision who have a high school diploma.
E. Standard for preclearance determinations. Preclearance submissions
must be evaluated in accordance with the standards set forth in this Section:
(1) Preclearance shall be denied if any of the following occur:
(a) The covered policy is more likely than not to diminish the
opportunity or ability of members of the protected class that provided a basis
for preclearance to participate in the political process and, in order of priority:
(i) elect candidates of their choice; or (ii) otherwise influence the outcome of
elections.
(b) The covered policy is more likely than not to violate this Act with
respect to claims that could be brought by members of the protected class that
provided a basis for preclearance.
(2) If denial is not required under R.S. 18:1965(E)(1), preclearance shall
be granted.
(3) Covered political subdivisions bear the burden of demonstrating that
preclearance shall be granted under this standard.
F. Procedures for obtaining preclearance. Covered political subdivisions
shall obtain preclearance for covered policies in accordance with this Section.
(1) Covered political subdivisions must submit covered policies to the
commission in writing pursuant to procedures determined by the commission.
(2) The commission must ensure that preclearance submissions and any
related materials that are submitted to the commission by covered political
subdivisions or other interested parties are posted in a central location on its
website in a timely fashion. The commission must ensure that members of the
public have reasonable opportunity to review and submit comments for
consideration by the commission before preclearance determinations are made.
(3) If the commission denies preclearance to a covered policy, the
covered political subdivisions may not implement the covered policy. The
Page 14 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
commission must provide a written explanation for any denial.
(4) If the commission grants preclearance to a covered policy, the
covered political subdivision may immediately implement the covered policy.
(5) A determination by the commission to grant preclearance is not
admissible in, and may not be considered by, a court in any subsequent action
challenging the covered policy. It does not preclude, bar, or limit in any way any
other claims that may be brought regarding the covered policy, including claims
brought under other sections of this Act.
G. Effective date. This Section takes effect one year after the enactment
of this Chapter.
§1966. Enforcement
A. Standing. An action to cure a violation of this Chapter may be
brought by any individual or entity aggrieved by a violation of this Chapter or
by the attorney general.
(1) An entity aggrieved by a violation of this Chapter includes but is not
limited to any entity that satisfies the following items:
(a) Whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by a violation of
this Chapter.
(b) Whose mission would be frustrated by a violation of this Chapter,
including but not limited to an entity that would expend or divert resources to
fulfill its mission as a result of such violation or who must expend greater
resources or efforts to advocate before an elected body that is less responsive to
the entity or its members due to the alleged violation.
(2) An entity must not be compelled to disclose the identity of any
specific member to pursue a claim on behalf of its members.
(3) This Section shall be construed liberally to confer standing as broadly
as the Constitution of Louisiana permits.
B. Safe harbor for political subdivisions. Before filing an action against
a political subdivision under this Chapter, an individual or entity aggrieved by
Page 15 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
a violation of this Chapter, except for the attorney general, shall send a notice
letter to the political subdivision identifying any potential violation and the type
of remedy the party believes may address the potential violation. The party may
not file an action within fifty days after sending the notice letter.
(1) The political subdivision may work with the party that provided
notice to implement a remedy that cures the potential violation. If the legislative
body of the political subdivision adopts a resolution identifying a remedy,
affirming its intent to enact and implement a remedy, and establishing a
timeline and specific steps it will take to do so, the party may not file an action
within one hundred twenty days after sending the notice letter.
(2) In response to a notice letter, the political subdivision may adopt a
resolution denying that a violation exists, or otherwise formally deny a violation,
which will abrogate the fifty-day waiting period and permit the party who sent
a notice letter to file an action immediately.
(3) If, under the laws of this state, the legislative body of a political
subdivision lacks authority to enact or implement a remedy identified in such
a resolution, the political subdivision may nonetheless enact and implement a
proposed remedy upon approval of a court of suitable jurisdiction.
(4) Following the party's submission of a notice letter, the party may file
an action if the political subdivision has not enacted or implemented a remedy
within the time periods designated by this Subsection or the political subdivision
has enacted or implemented a remedy that would not remedy the violation
identified in the party's notice letter.
(5) A party with standing pursuant to R.S. 18:1966(A) may file an action
against a political subdivision under this Chapter notwithstanding this
Subsection if any of the following occur:
(a) The party is seeking preliminary relief with respect to an upcoming
election.
(b) Another party has already submitted a notice letter alleging a
Page 16 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
substantially similar violation, and that party is eligible to file an action under
this Section.
(c) The prospect of obtaining relief under R.S. 18:1966(B)(1) would be
futile.
C. Venue. An action to enforce this Act may be brought in a trial court
pursuant to the rules of civil procedure.
D. Judicial actions concerning preclearance. Actions concerning R.S.
18:1965 may only be filed under the following circumstances:
(1) A political subdivision that has been designated as a covered political
subdivision under R.S. 18:1965 may challenge the determination within thirty
days of its publication in accordance with applicable state law governing
challenges to agency action, including the applicable standard of review of such
actions. Such actions may only be filed by the covered political subdivision and
intervention is not permitted.
(2) Any party, as defined in R.S. 18:1966(A), that is aggrieved by the
exclusion of a political subdivision from the list of covered political subdivisions
under R.S. 18:1965, may file an action to challenge the exclusion of a political
subdivision. These actions are subject to a three-year statute of limitations,
accruing from the date of any coverage determinations under R.S. 18:1965, and
are subject to a de novo standard of review.
(3) Any denial of preclearance by the commission under R.S. 18:1965
may be appealed only by the covered political subdivision within thirty days of
the denial in accordance with applicable state law governing challenges to
agency action, including the applicable standard of review of such actions.
These actions may only be filed by the covered political subdivision and
intervention is not permitted.
(4) Any party, as defined in R.S. 18:1966(A), that is aggrieved by a
determination by the commission to grant preclearance to a covered policy
under R.S. 18:1965(E), may file an action to challenge the determination to
Page 17 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
grant preclearance. These actions are subject to a de novo standard of review.
(5) If the commission fails to discharge any of its responsibilities under
this Chapter or any other action necessary to enforce a provision of this
Chapter, any party, as defined in R.S. 18:1966(A), that is aggrieved by this
failure may file an action seeking appropriate relief, including but not limited
to any injunctive relief on the commission or any other party to the action that
is necessary to enforce this Act. These actions are subject to a de novo standard
of review.
E. Expedited review. Actions brought pursuant to this Chapter shall be
subject to expedited pretrial and trial proceedings and receive an automatic
calendar preference.
F. Preliminary relief. In any action alleging a violation of this Chapter
in which a party seeks preliminary relief with respect to an upcoming election,
a court must grant relief if it determines that all of the following occurs:
(1) Plaintiffs are more likely than not to succeed on the merits.
(2) It is possible to implement an appropriate remedy that would resolve
the alleged violation in the upcoming election.
G. Remedies. Upon finding a violation of any provision of this Chapter,
a court shall order appropriate remedies notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary.
(1) The court may order remedies that are tailored to best mitigate the
violation, including any and all forms of preliminary and injunctive relief. The
court may consider, among others, any remedy that is available to a federal
court or the court of another state jurisdiction, including through a
court-approved consent decree or settlement adopted in the context of similar
facts or to remedy a similar violation.
(2) The court shall consider proposed remedies by any parties and
interested nonparties.
(3) The court may not give deference or priority to a remedy proposed
Page 18 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
by the political subdivision.
(4) A remedy ordered under this Section shall be implemented in the
next relevant election, scheduled or ordered, wherever possible.
H. Cause of action only under state law. This Chapter provides rights
and remedies under state law to enforce state constitutional rights or statutory
rights and does not enforce any rights established under the U.S. Constitution
or federal law. Nothing in this Chapter may be construed to create a cause of
action under federal law. Persuasive use of relevant federal legal standards,
precedents, or evidentiary frameworks to aid in the interpretation or
application of this Chapter should not be construed to give rise to a federal
question. Use of federal legal standards, precedent, or evidentiary frameworks
may be persuasive, but is not necessary to the interpretation or application of
this Chapter.
I. Laches. Defendants in actions under this Chapter may not assert the
doctrine of laches as a defense to claims brought under this Chapter. Political
subdivisions may not assert that plaintiffs have failed to comply with any notice,
exhaustion, or other procedural requirements under state law, other than the
requirements in this Section, as a defense to claims brought under this Section.
J. Attorneys' fees. In any action to enforce any provision of this Chapter,
a prevailing plaintiff party, other than the state or a political subdivision, is
entitled to recover all reasonable costs and fees from the defendant party. Costs
and fees include but are not limited to attorneys' fees, expert witness fees, and
all other litigation or pre-litigation fees and costs.
(1) A plaintiff is deemed to have prevailed in an action when, as a result
of a suit or notice letter pursuant to R.S. 18:1966(B), the defendant party yields
some or all of the relief sought in the action.
(2) If the state or political subdivision prevails in an action under this
Chapter, the court may not award the defendant party any fees or costs unless
the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.
Page 19 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-633 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 365
K. This Chapter is severable. If any provision of this Chapter or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity must
be applied as narrowly as possible and the remaining provisions and
applications must remain in effect to the fullest extent possible.
L. Construction. If any provision of this Chapter, including any legal
standard, requirement, or any part thereof, may be construed or applied in a
manner that is unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, the provision shall be
construed or applied in the manner that preserves its validity and is most
consistent with the purposes set forth in this Chapter.
M. Abrogation of legislative privilege. In any action under this Chapter
or any other voting-related violation of state or federal law, no sovereign,
governmental, executive, legislative, or deliberative immunities and privileges,
including any evidentiary privileges, may be asserted. This Section shall have
no effect on any attorney-client or attorney work-product privileges.
Section 2. Except where otherwise noted, this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.